California statutes. Family Code
(d) If an employer withholds support, as required by the assignment order, but fails to forward the support to the obligee, the local child support agency shall take appropriate action to collect the withheld sums from the employer. The child support obligee or the local child support agency upon application may obtain an order requiring payment of support by electronic transfer from the employer’s bank account if the employer has willfully failed to comply with the assignment order or if the employer has failed to comply with the assignment order on three separate occasions within a 12-month period. Where a court finds that an employer has willfully failed to comply with the assignment order or has otherwise failed to comply with the assignment order on three separate occasions within a 12-month period, the court may impose a civil penalty, in addition to any other penalty required by law, of up to 50 percent of
 the support amount that has not been received by the obligee.

(e) To facilitate employer awareness, the local child support agency shall make reasonable efforts to notify any employer subject to an assignment order pursuant to this chapter of the electronic fund transfer provision and enhanced penalties provided by this act.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any penalty payable pursuant to this subdivision shall be payable directly to the obligee. The local child support agency shall not be required to establish or collect this penalty on behalf of the obligee. The penalty shall not be included when determining the income of the obligee for the purpose of determining the eligibility of the obligee for benefits payable pursuant to state supplemental income programs. A court may issue the order requiring payment of support by electronic transfer from the employer’s bank account and impose the penalty described in this subdivision, after
 notice and hearing. This provision shall not be construed to expand or limit the duties and obligations of the Labor Commissioner, as set forth in Section 200 and following of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 308, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5242.

Service of the assignment order creates a lien on the earnings of the employee and the property of the employer to the same extent as the service of an earnings withholding order as provided in Section 706.029 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5243.

An assignment order for support has priority as against any attachment, execution, or other assignment as specified in Section 706.031 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 876, Sec. 26.   Effective October 6, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 37 of Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

5244.

A reference to the local child support agency in this chapter applies only when the local child support agency is otherwise ordered or required to act pursuant to law. Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to mandate additional enforcement or collection duties upon the local child support agency beyond those otherwise imposed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 61.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5245.

Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the local child support agency to use any other civil and criminal remedies to enforce support obligations, regardless of whether or not the child or the obligee who is the parent, guardian, or other person entitled to receive payment is the recipient of welfare moneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 62.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5246.

(a) This section applies only to Title IV-D cases where support enforcement services are being provided by the local child support agency pursuant to Section 17400.

(b) In lieu of an earnings assignment order signed by a judicial officer, the local child support agency may serve on the employer a notice of assignment in the manner specified in Section 5232. An order/notice to withhold income for child support shall have the same force and effect as an earnings assignment order signed by a judicial officer. An order/notice to withhold income for child support, when used under this section, shall be considered a notice and shall not require the
 signature of a judicial officer.

(c) Pursuant to Section 666 of Title 42 of the United States Code, the federally mandated order/notice to withhold income for child support shall be used for the purposes described in this section.

(d) (1) An order/notice to withhold income may not reduce the current amount withheld for court-ordered child support.

(2) If the underlying court order for support does not provide for an arrearage payment, or if an additional arrearage accrues after the date of the court order for support, the local child support agency may send an order/notice to withhold income for child support that shall be used for the purposes described in this section directly to the employer that
 specifies the updated arrearage amount and directs the employer to withhold an additional amount to be applied towards liquidation of the arrearages not to exceed the maximum amount permitted by Section 1673(b) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), if an obligor is disabled, meets the SSI resource test, and is receiving Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payments (SSI/SSP) or, but for excess income as described in Section 416.1100 et seq. of Part 416 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations, would be eligible to receive SSI/SSP, pursuant to Section 12200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the obligor has supplied the local child support agency with proof of eligibility for and, if applicable, receipt of, SSI/SSP or Social Security Disability Insurance benefits, then the
 order/notice to withhold income issued by the local child support agency for the liquidation of the arrearage shall not exceed 5 percent of the obligor’s total monthly Social Security Disability payments under Title II of the Social Security Act.

(e) If the obligor requests a hearing, a hearing date shall be scheduled within 20 days of the filing of the request with the court. The clerk of the court shall provide notice of the hearing to the local child support agency and the obligor no later than 10 days prior to the hearing.

(1) If, at the hearing, the obligor establishes that they are not the obligor or good cause or an alternative arrangement as provided in Section 5260, the court may order that service of the order/notice to withhold income for child support be quashed. If the
 court quashes service of the order/notice to withhold income for child support, the local child support agency shall notify the employer within 10 days.

(2) If the obligor contends at the hearing that the payment of arrearages at the rate specified in the order/notice to withhold income for child support is excessive or that the total arrearages owing is incorrect, and if it is determined that payment of the arrearages at the rate specified in this section creates an undue hardship upon the obligor or that the withholding would exceed the maximum amount permitted by Section 1673(b) of Title 15 of the United States Code Annotated, the rate at which the arrearages must be paid shall be reduced to a rate that is fair and reasonable considering the circumstances of the parties and the best interest of the child. If it is determined at a
 hearing that the total amount of arrearages calculated is erroneous, the court shall modify the amount calculated to the correct amount. If the court modifies the total amount of arrearages owed or reduces the monthly payment due on the arrearages, the local child support agency shall serve the employer with an amended order/notice to withhold income for child support within 10 days.

(f) If an obligor’s current support obligation has terminated by operation of law, the local child support agency may serve an order/notice to withhold income for child support on the employer
 that directs the employer to continue withholding from the obligor’s earnings an amount to be applied towards liquidation of the arrearages, not to exceed the maximum amount permitted by Section 1673(b) of Title 15 of the United States Code, until the employer is notified by the local child support agency that the arrearages have been paid in full. The employer shall provide the obligor with a copy of the order/notice to withhold income for child support and a blank form that the obligor may file with the court to request a hearing to modify or quash the assignment with instructions on how to file the form and obtain a hearing date. The obligor shall be entitled to the same rights to a hearing as specified in subdivision (e).

(g) The local child support agency shall retain a copy of the order/notice to withhold income
 for child support and shall file a copy with the court whenever a hearing concerning the order/notice to withhold income for child support is requested.

(h) The local child support agency may transmit an order/notice to withhold income for child support and other forms required by this section to the employer through electronic means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 55.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5247.

Neither the local child support agency nor an employer shall be subject to any civil liability for any amount withheld and paid to the obligee, the local child support agency, or the State Disbursement Unit pursuant to an earnings assignment order or notice of assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 387, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Support Orders Issued or Modified Before July 1, 1990 [5250. - 5253.]

5250.

For a support order first issued or modified before July 1, 1990, this article provides a procedure for obtaining an earnings assignment order for support when the court in ordering support or modification of support did not issue an assignment order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5251.

The obligee seeking issuance of an assignment order to enforce a support order described in Section 5250 may use the procedure set forth in this article by filing an application under Section 5252, or by notice of motion or order to show cause, or pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5230.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5252.

(a) An assignment order under this article may be issued only upon an application signed under penalty of perjury by the obligee that the obligor is in default in support payments in a sum equal to the amount of support payable for one month, for any other occurrence specified by the court in the support order, or earlier by court order if requested by the local child support agency or the obligor.

(b) If the order for support does not contain a provision for an earnings assignment order for support, the application shall state that the obligee has given the obligor a written notice of the obligee’s intent to seek an assignment order if there is a default in support payments and that the notice was transmitted by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or personally served at least 15 days before the date of the filing of the application. The written notice of the intent to seek an assignment order may be given at any time, including at the
 time of filing a petition or complaint in which support is requested or at any time subsequent thereto. The obligor may at any time waive the written notice required by this subdivision.

(c) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the filing of the application with knowledge of the falsity of the declaration or notice is punishable as a contempt pursuant to Section 1209 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 64.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5253.

Upon receipt of the application, the court shall issue, without notice to the obligor, an assignment order requiring the employer of the obligor to pay to the obligee or the State Disbursement Unit that portion of the earnings of the obligor due or to become due in the future as will be sufficient to pay an amount to cover both of the following:

(a) The amount ordered by the court for support.

(b) An amount which shall be ordered by the court to be paid toward the liquidation of any arrearage or past due support amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 387, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Stay of Service of Assignment Order [5260. - 5261.]

5260.

(a) The court may order that service of the assignment order be stayed only if the court makes a finding of good cause or if an alternative arrangement exists for payment in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, service of wage assignments issued for foreign orders for support, and service of foreign orders for the assignment of wages registered pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5700.601) of Part 6 shall not be stayed pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) For purposes of this section, good cause or an alternative arrangement for staying an assignment order is as follows:

(1) Good cause for staying a wage assignment exists only when all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The court provides a written explanation of why the stay of the wage assignment would be in the best interests of the child.

(B) The obligor has a history of uninterrupted, full, and timely payment, other than through a wage assignment or other mandatory process of previously ordered support, during the previous 12 months.

(C) The obligor does not owe an arrearage for prior support.

(D) The obligor proves, and the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence that service of the wage assignment would cause
 extraordinary hardship upon the obligor. Whenever possible, the court shall specify a date that any stay ordered under this section will automatically terminate.

(2) An alternative arrangement for staying a wage assignment order shall require a written agreement between the parties that provides for payment of the support obligation as ordered other than through the immediate service of a wage assignment. Any agreement between the parties which includes the staying of a service of a wage assignment shall include the concurrence of the local child support agency in any case in which support is ordered to be paid through a county officer designated for that purpose. The execution of an agreement pursuant to this paragraph shall not preclude a party from thereafter seeking a wage assignment in accordance with the procedures specified in Section
 5261 upon violation of the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 3.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5261.

(a) If service of the assignment order has been ordered stayed, the stay shall terminate pursuant to subdivision (b) upon the obligor’s failure to make timely support payments or earlier by court order if requested by the local child support agency or by the obligor. The stay shall terminate earlier by court order if requested by any other obligee who can establish that good cause, as defined in Section 5260, no longer exists.

(b) To terminate a stay of the service of the assignment order, the obligee shall file a declaration signed under penalty of perjury by the obligee that the obligor is in arrears in payment of any portion of the support. At the time of filing the declaration, the stay shall terminate by operation of law without notice to the obligor.

(c) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the filing of a declaration under subdivision (b) with knowledge of the falsity of its contents is
 punishable as a contempt pursuant to Section 1209 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 66.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Motion to Quash Assignment Order [5270. - 5272.]

5270.

(a) An obligor may move to quash an assignment order on any of the following grounds:

(1) The assignment order does not correctly state the amount of current or overdue support ordered by the courts.

(2) The alleged obligor is not the obligor from whom support is due.

(3) The amount to be withheld exceeds that allowable under federal law in subsection (b) of Section 1673 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(b) If an assignment order is sought under Article 3 (commencing with Section 5250), the party ordered to pay support may also move to quash the service of the order based upon Section 5260.

(c) The obligor shall state under oath the ground on which the motion to quash is made.

(d) If an assignment order which has been issued and served on a prior employer is served on the obligor’s new
 employer, the obligor does not have the right to move to quash the assignment order on any grounds which the obligor previously raised when the assignment order was served on the prior employer or on any grounds which the obligor could have raised when the assignment order was served on the prior employer but failed to raise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5271.

(a) The motion and notice of motion to quash the assignment order shall be filed with the court issuing the order within 10 days after delivery of the copy of the assignment order to the obligor by the employer.

(b) The clerk of the court shall set the motion to quash for hearing within not less than 15 days, nor more than 20 days, after receipt of the notice of motion.

(c) The obligor shall serve personally or by first-class mail, postage prepaid, a copy of the motion and notice of motion on the obligee named in the assignment order no less than 10 days before the date of the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5272.

A finding of error in the amount of the current support or arrearage or that the amount exceeds federal or state limits is not grounds to vacate the assignment order. The court shall modify the order to reflect the correct or allowable amount of support or arrearages. The fact that the obligor may have subsequently paid the arrearages does not relieve the court of its duty to enter the assignment order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Information Concerning Address and Employment of Obligor [5280. - 5282.]

5280.

If the obligee making the application under this chapter also states that the whereabouts of the obligor or the identity of the obligor’s employer is unknown to the party to whom support has been ordered to be paid, the local child support agency shall do both of the following:

(a) Contact the California parent locator service maintained by the Department of Justice in the manner prescribed in Section 17506.

(b) Upon receiving the requested information, notify the court of the last known address of the obligor and the name and address of the obligor’s last known employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 67.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5281.

An assignment order required or authorized by this chapter shall include a requirement that the obligor notify the obligee of any change of employment and of the name and address of the obligor’s new employer within 10 days of obtaining new employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5282.

After the obligor has left employment with the employer, the employer, at the time the next payment is due on the assignment order, shall notify the obligee designated in the assignment order by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the last known address of the obligee that the obligor has left employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Prohibited Practices [5290. - 5290.]

5290.

No employer shall use an assignment order authorized by this chapter as grounds for refusing to hire a person, or for discharging, taking disciplinary action against, denying a promotion to, or for taking any other action adversely affecting the terms and conditions of employment of, an employee. An employer who engages in the conduct prohibited by this section may be assessed a civil penalty of a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 369, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Judicial Council Forms [5295. - 5295.]

5295.

The Judicial Council shall prescribe forms necessary to carry out the requirements of this chapter, including the following:

(a) The written statement of the obligor’s rights.

(b) The earnings assignment order for support.

(c) The instruction guide for obligees and obligors.

(d) The application forms required under Sections 5230, 5252, and 5261.

(e) The notice form required under Section 5252.

(f) Revised judgment and assignment order forms as necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Intercounty Support Obligations [5600. - 5604.]

5600.

(a) A local child support agency or obligee may register an order for support or earnings withholding, or both, obtained in another county of the state.

(b) An obligee may register a support order in the court of another county of this state in the manner, with the effect, and for the purposes provided in this part. The orders may be registered in any county in which the obligor, the obligee, or the child who is the subject of the order resides, or in any county in which the obligor has income, assets, or any other property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 68.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5601.

(a) When the local child support agency is responsible for the enforcement of a support order pursuant to Section 17400, the local child support agency may register a support order made in another county by utilizing the procedures set forth in Section 5602 or by filing all of the following in the superior court of the agency’s county:

(1) An endorsed file copy of the most recent support order or a copy thereof.

(2) A statement of arrearages, including an accounting of amounts ordered and paid each month, together with any added costs, fees, and interest.

(3) A statement prepared by the local child support agency showing the post office address of the local child support agency, the last known place of residence or post office address of the obligor; the most recent address of the obligor set forth in the licensing records of the Department of Motor Vehicles, if known; and a list of other states and counties in California that are known to the local child support agency in which the original order of support and any modifications are registered.

(b) The filing of the documents described in subdivision (a) constitutes registration under this chapter.

(c) Promptly upon registration, the local child support agency, in compliance with the requirements of Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or in any other manner as
 provided by law, shall serve the obligor with copies of the documents described in subdivision (a).

(d) If a motion to vacate registration is filed under Section 5603, a party may introduce into evidence copies of pleadings, documents, or orders that have been filed in the original court or other courts where the support order has been registered or modified. Certified copies of the documents shall not be required unless a party objects to the authenticity or accuracy of the
 document, in which case it shall be the responsibility of the party who is asserting the authenticity of the document to obtain a certified copy of the questioned document.

(e) Upon registration, the clerk of the court shall forward a notice of registration to the courts in other counties and states in which the original order for support and any modifications were issued or registered. Further proceedings regarding the obligor’s support obligations shall not be filed in other counties.

(f) The procedure prescribed by this section may also be used to register support or wage and earnings assignment orders of other California jurisdictions that previously have been registered for purposes of enforcement only pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (Part 6
 (commencing with Section 5700.101)) in another California county. The local child support agency may register such an order by filing an endorsed file copy of the registered California order plus any subsequent orders, including procedural amendments.

(g) The Judicial Council shall develop the forms necessary to effectuate this section. These forms shall be available no later than July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 56.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5602.

(a) An obligee other than the local child support agency may register an order issued in this state using the same procedures specified in subdivision (a) of Section 5601, except that the obligee shall prepare and file the statement of registration. The statement shall be verified and signed by the obligee showing the mailing address of the obligee, the last known place of residence or mailing address of the obligor, and a list of other states and counties in California in which, to the obligee’s knowledge, the original order of support and any modifications are registered.

(b) Upon receipt of the documents described in subdivision (a) of Section 5601, the clerk of the court shall file them without payment of a filing fee or other cost to the obligee. The filing constitutes registration under this chapter.

(c) Promptly upon registration, the clerk of the court shall send, by any form of mail requiring a
 return receipt from the addressee only, to the obligor at the address given a notice of the registration with a copy of the registered support order and the post office address of the obligee. Proof shall be made to the satisfaction of the court that the obligor personally received the notice of registration by mail or other method of service. A return receipt signed by the obligor shall be satisfactory evidence of personal receipt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 70.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5603.

(a) An obligor shall have 20 days after the service of notice of the registration of a California order of support in which to file a noticed motion requesting the court to vacate the registration or for other relief. In an action under this section, there shall be no joinder of actions, coordination of actions, or cross-complaints, and the claims or defenses shall be limited strictly to the identity of the obligor, the validity of the underlying California support order, or the accuracy of the obligee’s statement of the amount of support remaining unpaid unless the amount has been previously established by a judgment or order. The obligor shall serve a copy of the motion, personally or by first-class mail, on
 the local child support agency, private attorney representing the obligee, or obligee who is self-representing who filed the request for registration of the order, not less than 15 days prior to the date on which the motion is to be heard. If service is by mail, Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure applies. If the obligor does not file the motion within 20 days, the registered California support order and all other documents filed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5601 or Section 5602 are confirmed.

(b) At the hearing on the motion to vacate the registration of the order, the obligor may present only matters that would be available to the obligor as defenses in an action to enforce a support judgment. If the obligor shows, and the court finds, that an appeal from the order is pending or that a stay of execution has been granted,
 the court shall stay enforcement of the order until the appeal is concluded, the time for appeal has expired, or the order is vacated, upon satisfactory proof that the obligor has furnished security for payment of the support ordered. If the obligor shows, and the court finds, any ground upon which enforcement of a California support order may be stayed, the court shall stay enforcement of the order for an appropriate period if the obligor furnishes security for payment of support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 57.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.

A previous determination of paternity made by another state, whether established through voluntary acknowledgment procedures in effect in that state or through an administrative or judicial process shall be given full faith and credit by the courts in this state, and shall have the same effect as a paternity determination made in this state and may be enforced and satisfied in a like manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 599, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Private Child Support Collectors [5610. - 5616.]

5610.

For the purposes of this chapter, “private child support collector” means any individual, corporation, attorney, nonprofit organization, or other nongovernmental entity who is engaged by an obligee to collect child support ordered by a court or other tribunal for a fee or other consideration. The term does not include any attorney who addresses issues of ongoing child support or child support arrearages in the course of an action to establish parentage or a child support obligation, a proceeding under Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200), a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or nullity of marriage, or in postjudgment or modification proceedings related to any of those actions. A “private child support collector” includes any private, nongovernmental attorney whose business is substantially comprised of the collection
 or enforcement of child support. As used in this section, substantially means that at least 50 percent of the attorney’s business, either in terms of remuneration or time spent, is comprised of the activity of seeking to collect or enforce child support obligations for other individuals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5611.

(a) A contract for the collection of child support between a private child support collector and an obligee shall be in writing and written in simple language, in at least 10-point type, signed by the private child support collector and the obligee. The contract shall be delivered to the obligee in a paper form that the obligee may retain for their records. The contract shall include all of the following:

(1) An explanation of the fees imposed by contract and otherwise permitted by law and an example of how they are calculated and deducted.

(2) A statement that the amount of fees to be
 charged is set by the agency and is not set by state law.

(3) A statement that the private child support collector cannot charge fees on current support if the obligee received any current child support during the 6 months preceding execution of the contract with the private collector.

(4) An explanation of the nature of the services to be provided.

(5) The expected duration of the contract, stated as a length of time or as an amount to be collected by the collection agency.

(6) An explanation of the opportunities available to the obligee or private child support collector to cancel the contract or other conditions under which the contract terminates.

(7) The mailing address, street address, telephone numbers, facsimile numbers, and internet address or location of the private child support collector.

(8) A statement that the private child support collector is not a governmental entity and that governmental entities in California provide child support collection and enforcement services free of charge.

(9) A statement that the private child support collector collects only money owed to the obligee and not support assigned to the state or county due to the receipt of CalWORKs or Temporary Assistance to Needy Families.

(10) A statement that the private child support collector will not retain fees from
 collections that are primarily attributable to the actions of a governmental entity or any other person or entity and is required by law to refund any fees improperly retained.

(11) A statement that the obligee may continue to receive, or may pursue, services through a governmental entity to collect support, and the private child support collection agency will not require or request that the obligee cease or refrain from engaging those services.

(12) A notice that the private child support collector is required to keep and maintain case records for a period of four years and four months, after the expiration of the contract and may thereafter destroy or otherwise dispose of the records. The obligee may, prior to destruction or disposal, retrieve those portions of the records that
 are not confidential.

(13) A “Notice of Cancellation,” which shall be included with the contract and which shall contain, in the same size font as the contract, the following statement, written in the same language as the contract:“Notice of CancellationYou may cancel this contract, without any penalty or obligation, within 15business days from the date the contract is signed or you receive this notice,whichever is later, or at any time if the private child support collectorcommits a material breach of any provision of the contract or a materialviolation of any provision of this chapter with respect to the obligee or theobligor,
 or _____________________________ (all other reasons forcancellation permitted).To cancel this contract, mail or deliver a signed copy of this cancellationnotice or any other written notice to ______________________(name ofprivate child support collector) at____________________________________________ (address for mail ordelivery) no later than midnight on ______________(date).I am canceling this contract.______________(date)________________________(signature)”(14) The following statement by the obligee on the first page of the contract: 

“I understand that this contract calls for (name of private child support collector) to
 collect money owed to me, and not money owed to the state or county. If child support is owed to the state or county because I am receiving or have received program benefits from CalWORKs or Temporary Assistance to Needy Families, then (name of private child support collector) cannot collect that money for me. If I start to receive program benefits from CalWORKs or Temporary Assistance to Needy Families during this contract, I must notify (name of private child support collector) in writing.”

“I declare by my signature below that the child support to be collected for me pursuant to this contract is not assigned to the state or county as of the time I sign this contract. I agree that I will give written notice to the private child support collector if I apply for program benefits under CalWORKs or Temporary Assistance to Needy Families during the term of
 this contract.” 

(15) (A) The following statement by the obligee immediately above the signature line of the contract: 

“I understand that (name of private child support collector) will charge a fee for all the current child support and arrears it collects for me until the entire contract amount is collected or the contract terminates for another reason. I also understand that depending on the frequency and size of payments, it could take years for the amount specified in my contract to be collected. This means that if (name of private child support collector) is collecting my current support by wage withholding or other means, I will not receive the full amount of my periodic court-ordered current support until the contract terminates since (name of private child support collector)
 will be deducting its fee from the periodic court-ordered current support it collects for me.” 

(B) The statement required by subparagraph (A) shall:

(i) Be in a type size that is at least equal to one-quarter of the largest type size used in the contract. In no event shall the disclosure be printed in less than 8-point type.

(ii) Be in a contrasting style, and contrasting color or bold type, that is equally or more visible than the type used in the contract.

(b) The disclosures required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5612 shall be printed in the contract, as follows:

(1) In a type size
 that is at least equal to one-quarter of the largest type size used in the contract. In no event shall the disclosure be printed in less than 8-point type.

(2) In a contrasting style, and contrasting color or bold type that is equally or more visible than the type used in the contract.

(3) Immediately above, below, or beside the stated fee without any intervening words, pictures, marks, or symbols.

(4) In the same language as the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 58.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5612.

(a) Each private child support collector:

(1) That charges any initial fee, processing fee, application fee, filing fee, or other fee or assessment that must be paid by an obligee regardless of whether any child support collection is made on behalf of the obligee shall make the following disclosure in every radio, television, or print advertisement intended for a target audience consisting primarily of California residents:

“(Name of private child support collector) is not a governmental entity and charges an upfront fee for its services even if it does not collect anything.”

(2) That does not charge any fee or assessment specified in paragraph (1) shall make the following disclosure in every radio, television, or print advertisement aired for a target audience
 consisting primarily of California residents:

“(Name of private child support collector) is not a governmental entity and charges a fee for its services.”

(b) The disclosures required in subdivision (a) shall also be stated during the first 30 seconds of any initial telephone conversation with an obligee and in the private child support collector’s contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5613.

(a) An obligee shall have the right to cancel a contract with a private support collector under either of the following circumstances:
